District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.07a

Establishment of the Facilities Service Request Fund.

(a)

There is established within the General Fund of the District of Columbia a lapsing account to be known as the Facilities Service Request Fund (“Fund”). All funds received by the Department from non-District government tenants in District government facilities for facility- related services, including maintenance, janitorial, security, construction, or other services, provided by the Department in accordance with this chapter shall be deposited into the Fund.

(b)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of each fiscal year.

(c)

The Fund shall be administered by the Department, and shall be used for facility-related services at real property owned or leased by the District of Columbia and under the control of the Department.

History

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1028a
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1022, 59 DCR 8025

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 1022 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).